Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Creation and Validity of Express Trusts

53-12-20.
Express trusts.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, an express trust shall be created or declared in writing and signed by the settlor or an agent for the settlor acting under a power of attorney containing express authorization.

An express trust shall have, ascertainable with reasonable certainty:

An intention by a settlor to create such trust;

Trust property;

Except for charitable trusts or a trust for care of an animal, a beneficiary who is reasonably ascertainable at the time of the creation of such trust or reasonably ascertainable within the period of the rule against perpetuities;

A trustee; and

Trustee duties specified in writing or provided by law.

The requirement that a trust have a reasonably ascertainable beneficiary shall be satisfied if under the trust instrument the trustee or some other person has the power to select the beneficiaries based on a standard or in the discretion of the trustee or other person.

In the case of a trust created pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 1396p(d)(4)(B) by an agent acting for the settlor, the power of attorney need not contain an express authorization to create or declare a trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 9/SB 134.

53-12-21.
Formal and precatory words.

No formal words shall be necessary to create an express trust.

Words otherwise precatory in nature will create a trust only if they are sufficiently imperative to show a settlor’s intention to impose enforceable duties on a trustee and if all other elements of an express trust are present.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Rule Against Perpetuities as Applied to Georgia Wills and Trusts,” see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 235 (1982).

53-12-22.
Trust purposes and conditions in terrorem.

A trust may be created for any lawful purpose.

A condition in terrorem shall be void unless there is a direction in the trust instrument as to the disposition of the property if the condition in terrorem is violated, in which event the direction in the trust instrument shall be carried out, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

A condition in terrorem shall not be enforceable against an individual for:

Bringing an action for interpretation or enforcement of a trust instrument;

Bringing an action for an accounting, for removal, or for other relief against a trustee; or

Entering into a settlement agreement.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-74/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section” in subsection (b); and added subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-23.
Capacity of settlor.

A person has capacity to create an inter vivos trust to the extent that such person has legal capacity to transfer title to property inter vivos. A person has capacity to create a testamentary trust to the extent that such person has legal capacity to devise or bequeath property by will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-24.
Non-merger.

No trust shall be invalid or terminated and no merger of title to trust property shall occur merely because the trustee or trustees are the same person or persons as the beneficiary or beneficiaries of the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-25.
Transfer of property in trust.

Transfer of property in trust shall require a transfer of legal title to the trustee. In any transfer of property or any interest in property, if a trust is named as a grantee, whether such trust is held under the laws of this state or of any other jurisdiction, then such transfer is deemed to have been made to the trustee of such trust as though the trustee of such trust had been named as grantee instead of the trust.

For any interest in real property to become trust property in a trust of which any transferor is a trustee, the instrument of conveyance shall additionally be recorded in the appropriate real property records.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 6/HB 121.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 295 (2013).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-26.
Additions to trust property.

Property may be added to an existing trust from any source in any manner if the addition is not prohibited by the trust instrument and the property is acceptable to the trustee.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-27.
Construction; parol evidence.

When the construction of an express trust is at issue, the court may hear parol evidence of the circumstances surrounding the settlor at the time of the execution of the trust and parol evidence to explain all ambiguities, both latent and patent.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-28.
Trusts for animals.

A trust may be created to provide for the care of an animal that is alive during the settlor’s lifetime. The trust shall terminate upon the death of such animal or, if the trust was created to provide for the care of more than one animal alive during the settlor’s lifetime, upon the death of the last surviving animal.

A trust authorized by this Code section may be enforced by a person appointed in the trust instrument or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court. A person having an interest in the welfare of the animal may request the court to appoint a person to enforce the trust or to remove a person appointed.

Upon termination of a trust authorized by this Code section, the trustee shall transfer any unexpended trust property in the following order:

As directed in the trust instrument;

If the trust was created in a nonresiduary clause in the settlor’s will or in a codicil to the settlor’s will, under the residuary clause in the settlor’s will; and

If no taker is produced by the application of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection, to the settlor, if living, and if not, to the settlor’s heirs, as determined under Code Section 53-2-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.